Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-105 Records, statements and reports.
(a) All records, statements and reports required or authorized by this code
shall be made in writing in the English language.

(b) All statements, estimates, percentages,
payments, and calculations required or authorized by this code shall be made on
the basis of the lawful money of the United States. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next